Maine, session 132, LD2128.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §88, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2019, c. 370, §16, is further
amended to read:
A. The board has one member representing each region, each of whom is appointed
by the representative's regional council, and 12 5 persons in addition. Of the additional
persons, one is an emergency physician, one a representative of emergency medical
dispatch providers, one a representative of the public, one a representative of for-profit
ambulance services, one an emergency professional nurse, one a representative of
nontransporting emergency medical services, one a representative of hospitals, one a
fire chief, one a representative of a statewide association of fire chiefs, one a municipal
emergency medical services provider, one a representative of not-for-profit ambulance
services and one a representative in the field of pediatrics. The members that represent
for-profit ambulance services, nontransporting emergency medical services and not-
for-profit ambulance services must be licensed emergency medical services persons.
One of the nonpublic members must be a volunteer emergency medical services
provider a representative of an emergency medical dispatch center or emergency
medical dispatch provider, one is a representative of a municipal fire department
administration, one is a representative of emergency medical services administrators,
one is an emergency medical services paramedic licensed in the State and one is an
emergency medical technician or advanced emergency medical technician licensed in
the State. Appointments are for 3-year terms. Members, except the regional
representatives and ex officio members, are appointed by the Governor. The statewide
emergency medical services medical director and, the statewide associate emergency
medical services medical director and the commissioner or the commissioner's
designee are ex officio nonvoting members of the board.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §88, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 1991, c. 588, §16, is further
amended to read:
Page 1 - 132LR2781(03)

B. The board shall elect its own chair to serve for a 2-year term. The board may adopt
internal rules that may include, but are not limited to, termination of board membership
as a consequence of irregular attendance. If a board member appointed by the
Governor does not serve a full term of appointment, the Governor shall appoint a
successor to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term. If a board member
appointed by a regional council does not serve a full term of appointment, the regional
council that appointed the board member shall appoint a successor to fill the vacancy
for the remainder of the term. Any board member may be removed by the Governor
for cause. The board may have a common seal. The board may establish
subcommittees as it determines appropriate.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §88, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 1991, c. 588, §16, is further
amended to read:
C. The board shall meet at least quarterly, and at the call of its chair or at the request
of 7 5 members. When the board meets, members are entitled to compensation
according to the provisions of Title 5, chapter 379.
Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §88, sub-§2, ¶M is enacted to read:
M. The board shall by January 1st annually submit a report to the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over emergency medical services
matters and the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
emergency medical services personnel licensing matters with any recommendations
for changes to this chapter and in related provisions as the board may determine
appropriate. Either committee may report out legislation related to the
recommendations in the report.
Sec. 5. 32 MRSA §89, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2007, c. 274, §21, is further
amended to read:
1. Regions to be established; regional councils. The board shall delineate regions
within the State to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The board shall set out conditions
under which an organization in each region may be recognized by the board as the regional
council for that region. A regional council shall, at a minimum, provide adequate
representation for ambulance services and rescue nontransporting emergency medical
services, emergency room physicians and nurses, hospitals emergency medical dispatch
centers and emergency medical dispatchers, emergency medical services training centers
and the general public. A regional council must be structured to adequately represent each
major geographical part of its region. Only one regional council may be recognized in any
region.
Sec. 6. 32 MRSA §89, sub-§2, ¶F, as amended by PL 2007, c. 274, §21, is further
amended to read:
F. Nominating 2 or more candidates Appointing a candidate from each region for a
position on the Emergency Medical Services' Board, from whom the Governor may
select a member board; and
Sec. 7. 32 MRSA §89, sub-§2, ¶G, as enacted by PL 1985, c. 730, §§13 and 16, is
amended to read:
G. Establishing regional goals to carry out the provisions of this chapter.; and
Page 2 - 132LR2781(03)

Sec. 8. 32 MRSA §89, sub-§2, ¶H is enacted to read:
H. Regularly advising the representative to the board on issues, concerns and policies
affecting the region that the council represents.
Sec. 9. Transition. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 32, section
88, subsection 1, a member of the Emergency Medical Services' Board serving on the
effective date of this Act continues to serve until the expiration of that member's term.
Page 3 - 132LR2781(03)